Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1052
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means direct day-to-day knowledge of and control over the actions of one individual by another.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 31;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-370;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 314.